Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1245
Jurisdiction declined by reason of conduct.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in section 43-1241 or by other law of this state, if a court of this state has jurisdiction under the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act because a person seeking to invoke its jurisdiction has engaged in unjustifiable conduct, the court shall decline to exercise its jurisdiction unless:

(1) the parents and all persons acting as parents have acquiesced in the exercise of jurisdiction;

(2) a court of the state otherwise having jurisdiction under sections 43-1238 to 43-1240 determines that this state is a more appropriate forum under section 43-1244; or

(3) no court of any other state would have jurisdiction under the criteria specified in sections 43-1238 to 43-1240.

(b) If a court of this state declines to exercise its jurisdiction pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, it may fashion an appropriate remedy to ensure the safety of the child and prevent a repetition of the unjustifiable conduct, including staying the proceeding until a child custody proceeding is commenced in a court having jurisdiction under sections 43-1238 to 43-1240.

(c) If a court dismisses a petition or stays a proceeding because it declines to exercise its jurisdiction pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, it may assess against the party seeking to invoke its jurisdiction necessary and reasonable expenses including costs, communication expenses, attorney's fees, investigative fees, expenses for witnesses, travel expenses, and child care during the course of the proceedings, unless the party from whom fees are sought establishes that the assessment would be clearly inappropriate. The court may not assess fees, costs, or expenses against this state unless authorized by law other than the act.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 20.